Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-515
Aircraft or boats; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to hunt, drive, or stir up game birds or game animals with or from any aircraft or boat propelled by sail or power. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 235.